Washington statutes.
RCW 35.57.060

Expenditure of funds—Purposes.

(1) The board of directors of the public facilities district shall have authority to authorize the expenditure of funds for the public purposes of preparing and distributing information to the general public and promoting, advertising, improving, developing, operating, and maintaining a regional center. For promotional activities the district board must: (a) Identify the proposed expenditure in its annual budget; and (b) adopt written rules governing promotional hosting by employees, agents, and the board, including requirements for identifying and evaluating the public benefits to be derived and documenting the public benefits realized.

(2) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to authorize preparation and distribution of information to the general public for the purpose of influencing the outcome of a district election.

[ 2009 c 167 s 2; 1999 c 165 s 6.]